California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 95.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.1.

(a) The amount of any charitable contribution of property otherwise taken into account under Section 24357 shall be reduced by the amount of gain that would have been realized if the property contributed had been sold by the taxpayer at its fair market value (determined at the time of that contribution).

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), in the case of a charitable contribution of less than
 the taxpayer’s entire interest in the property contributed, the taxpayer’s adjusted basis in that property shall be allocated between the interest contributed and any interest not contributed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall apply in the case of a charitable contribution of tangible personal property if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The use by the donee is unrelated to the purpose or function constituting the basis for its exemption under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 23701, or, in the case of a governmental unit, to any purpose or function described in Section 24359.

(2) The tangible personal property is applicable property that is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of by the donee before
 the last day of the taxable year in which the contribution was made and with respect to which the donee has not made a certification in accordance with paragraph (3) of subdivision (d).

(d) (1) In the case of an applicable disposition of applicable property, there shall be included in the income of the donor of that property for the taxable year of the donor in which the applicable disposition occurs an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the following amount:

(A) The amount of the deduction allowed to the donor under Section 24357 with respect to that property, over

(B) The donor’s basis in that property at the time that property was contributed.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Applicable disposition” means any sale, exchange, or other disposition by the donee of applicable property after the last day of the taxable year of the donor in which that property was contributed, and before the last day of the three-year period beginning on the date of the contribution of that property, unless the donee makes a certification in accordance with paragraph (3).

(B) “Applicable property” means charitable deduction property, as defined in Section 6050L(a)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, that is tangible personal property, the use of which is identified by the donee as related to the purpose or function constituting the basis of the donee’s exemption under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 23701, and for which a deduction in excess of the donor’s basis is allowed.

(3) A
 certification meets the requirements of this paragraph if it is a written statement, which is signed under penalty of perjury by an officer of the donee organization, that meets either of the following conditions:

(A) Certifies that the use of the property by the donee was related to the purpose or function constituting the basis for the donee’s exemption under Section 501 of the Internal Revenue Code or Section 23701 and describes how the property was used and how that use furthered that purpose or function.

(B) States the intended use of the property by the donee at the time of the contribution and certifies that the intended use has become impossible or infeasible to implement.

(e) (1) For purposes of Section 24357 and subdivision (a), and notwithstanding Section 24912, in the case of a
 charitable contribution of taxidermy property that is made by the person who prepared, stuffed, or mounted the property, or by any person who paid or incurred the cost of such preparation, stuffing, or mounting, only the cost of the preparing, stuffing, or mounting shall be included in the basis of that property.

(2) For purposes of this section, “taxidermy property” means any work of art that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(A) Is the reproduction or preservation of an animal, in whole or in part.

(B) Is prepared, stuffed, or mounted for purposes of recreating one or more characteristics of the animal.

(C) Contains a part of the body of the dead animal.

(f) The amendments
 made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2010, without regard to taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 71.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.2.

(a) In the case of a contribution (not made by a transfer in trust) of an interest in property which consists of less than the taxpayer’s entire interest in such property, a deduction shall be allowed under Section 24357 only to the extent that the value of the interest contributed would be allowable as a deduction under Section 24357 if such interest had been transferred in trust. For purposes of this subdivision, a contribution by a taxpayer of the right to use property shall be treated as a contribution of less than the taxpayer’s
 entire interest in such property.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a contribution of—

(1) A remainder interest in a personal residence or farm,

(2) An undivided portion of the taxpayer’s entire interest in property,

(3) A qualified conservation contribution (as defined in Section 24357.7).

(c) The amendments made to this section by the 1977–78 Legislature shall apply with respect to contributions of transfers made after December 31, 1976, and before June 14, 1977.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the 1981–82 Regular Session of the Legislature shall apply with respect to contributions or transfers made in
 taxable years beginning on and after January 1, 1982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 143.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.3.

For purposes of Section 24357, in determining the value of a remainder interest in real property, depreciation (computed on the straight line method) and depletion of such property shall be taken into account, and such value shall be discounted at a rate of 6 percent per annum, except that the Franchise Tax Board may prescribe a different rate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.4.

If, in connection with any charitable contribution, a liability is assumed by the recipient or by any other person, or if a charitable contribution is of property which is subject to a liability, then, to the extent necessary to avoid the duplication of amounts, the amount taken into account for purposes of Section 24357 as the amount of the charitable contribution—(a) Shall be reduced for interest (1) which
 has been paid (or is to be paid) by the taxpayer, (2) which is attributable to the liability, and (3) which is attributable to any period after the making of the contribution, and(b) In the case of a bond, shall be further reduced for interest (1) which has been paid (or is to be paid) by the taxpayer on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or carry such bond, and (2) which is attributable to any period before the making of the contribution.The reduction pursuant to subdivision (b) shall not exceed the interest (including interest equivalent) on the bond which is attributable to any period before the making of the contribution and which is not (under the taxpayer’s method of accounting) includable in the gross income of the taxpayer for any taxable year. For purposes of this section, the term “bond” means any bond, debenture,
 note, or certificate or other evidence of indebtedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.5.

No deduction shall be allowed under Section 24357 for a contribution to or for the use of an organization or trust described in Section 4948(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 938, Sec. 29.   Effective September 7, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.6.

No deduction shall be allowed under this part for an out-of-pocket expenditure made on behalf of an organization described in Section 24359 (other than an organization described in subdivision (e) of Section 23704.5 (relating to churches, etc.)) if the expenditure is made for the purpose of influencing legislation (within the meaning of Section 23701d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 96.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.7.

(a) (1) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 24357.2, the term “qualified conservation contribution” means a contribution—

(A) Of a qualified real property interest,

(B) To a qualified organization,

(C) Exclusively for
 conservation purposes.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the term “qualified real property interest” means any of the following interests in real property:

(i) The entire interest of the donor other than a qualified mineral interest.

(ii) A remainder interest.

(iii) A restriction (granted in perpetuity) on the use which may be made of the real property.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the term “qualified organization” means an organization which:

(1) Is described in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 24359, or

(2) Is described in Section 23701(d),
 and—

(A) Meets the requirements of Section 509(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, or

(B) Meets the requirements of Section 509(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is controlled by an organization described in paragraph (1) or in subparagraph (A).

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “conservation purpose” means any of the following:

(1) The preservation of land areas for outdoor recreation by, or the education of, the general public.

(2) The protection of a relatively natural habitat of fish, wildlife, or plants, or similar ecosystem.

(3) The preservation of open space (including farm land and forest land) where
 that preservation is for any of the following:

(A) For the scenic enjoyment of the general public.

(B) Pursuant to a clearly delineated federal, state, or local governmental conservation policy, and will yield a significant public benefit.

(C) The preservation of a historically important land area or a certified historic structure.

(d) In the case of any contribution of a qualified real property interest, which is a restriction with respect to the exterior of a building described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), that contribution shall not be considered to be exclusively for conservation purposes unless all of the following conditions are met:

(1) That interest includes a restriction
 that preserves the entire exterior of the building, including the front, sides, rear, and height of the building, and prohibits any change in the exterior of the building that is inconsistent with the historical character of that exterior.

(2) The donor and donee enter into a written agreement certifying, under penalty of perjury, that the donee is a qualified organization, as defined in subdivision (b), with a purpose of environmental protection, land conservation, and open-space preservation, and has the resources to manage and enforce the restriction and a commitment to do so.

(3) In the case of any contribution made in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010, the taxpayer includes with the taxpayer’s return for the taxable year of the contribution all of the following information:

(A) A qualified
 appraisal, within the meaning of Section 170(f)(11)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified property interest.

(B) Photographs of the entire exterior of the building.

(C) A description of all restrictions on the development of the building.

(e) The term “certified historic structure” means either of the following:

(1) Any building, structure, or land area that is listed in the National Register.

(2) (A) Any building that is located in a registered historic district (as defined in Section 47(c)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code) and is certified by the Secretary of the Interior to the secretary as being of historic significance to the district.

(B) A building, structure, or land area satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (A) if it satisfies those requirements either at the time of the transfer or on the due date (including extensions) for filing the transferor’s return under this part for the taxable year in which the transfer is made.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) A contribution shall not be treated as exclusively for conservation purposes unless the conservation purpose is protected in perpetuity.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), in the case of a contribution of any interest where there is a retention of a qualified mineral interest, this subdivision shall not be treated as met if at any time there may be extraction or removal of minerals by any
 surface mining method.

(B) With respect to any contribution of property in which the ownership of the surface estate and mineral interests has been and remains separated, paragraph (1) shall be treated as met if the probability of surface mining occurring on that property is so remote as to be negligible.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “qualified mineral interest” means either of the following:

(1) Subsurface oil, gas, or other minerals.

(2) The right to access to those minerals.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 72.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.8.

(a) In the case of a qualified research contribution, the amount otherwise allowed as a deduction under Section 24357, shall be reduced by that amount of the reduction provided by Section 24357.1 which is no greater than the sum of the following:

(1) One-half of the amount computed pursuant to Section 24357.1 (computed without regard to this paragraph).

(2) The amount (if any) by which the charitable
 contribution deduction under this section for any qualified research contribution (computed by taking into account the amount determined by paragraph (1), but without regard to this paragraph) exceeds twice the basis of the property.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified research contribution” means a charitable contribution by a taxpayer of tangible personal property described in paragraph (1) of Section 1221 of the Internal Revenue Code, but only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The contribution is to an educational organization which is described in subsection (b)(1)(A)(ii) of Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and which is an institution of higher education (as defined in Section 3304(f) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954) in California.

(2) The contribution is made not later than
 two years after the date the construction of the property is substantially completed.

(3) The original use of the property is by the donee.

(4) The property is scientific equipment or apparatus substantially all of the use of which by the donee is for research or experimentation (within the meaning of Section 24365), or for research training, in physical, applied, or biological sciences, or for instructional purposes.

(5) The property is not transferred by the donee in exchange for money, other property, or services.

(6) The taxpayer receives from the donee a written statement representing that its use and disposition of the property will be in accordance with this section, and with respect to property substantially all of the use of which is for
 instructional purposes, the taxpayer receives from the donee a written statement representing that the property will be used as an integral part of the instructional program. In the case of a computer, the statement shall also represent that the donee has acquired or will acquire, necessary basic operational software and the means to provide trained staff to utilize the property.

(7) The contribution is made on or after July 1, 1983, and on or before December 31, 1993.

(8) The taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board, on forms prescribed by the board, the name and address of the recipient educational organization, a description of the qualified charitable contribution, the fair market value of the contribution, and the date the contribution was made. The taxpayer shall forward a copy of the forms, along with the written statements prescribed in paragraph (6), to the
 following:

(A) The President of the University of California, in the case of contributions to institutions within the University of California system.

(B) California Postsecondary Education Commission, in the case of contributions to private institutions.

(C) The Chancellor of the California State University, in the case of contributions to institutions within the California State University system.

(D) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, in the case of contributions to institutions within the California Community College system.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “taxpayer” shall not include a service organization (as defined in Section 414(m)(3) of the Internal
 Revenue Code ).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 82.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.9.

(a) In the case of a qualified computer contribution, the amount otherwise allowed as a deduction under Section 24357 shall be reduced by that amount of the reduction provided by Section 24357.1 that is no greater than the sum of the following:

(1) One-half of the amount computed pursuant to Section 24357.1 (computed without regard to this paragraph).

(2) The amount (if any) by which the charitable
 contribution deduction under this section for any qualified computer contribution (computed by taking into account the amount determined by paragraph (1), but without regard to this paragraph) exceeds twice the basis of the property.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “qualified computer contribution” means a charitable contribution by a corporation of any computer technology or equipment, but only if all of the following apply:

(1) The contribution is to either of the following:

(A) An educational organization described in Section 170(b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) An entity described in Section 23701d and exempt from tax under Section 23701 (other than an entity described in subparagraph (A)) that is organized primarily for
 purposes of supporting elementary and secondary education in California.

(C) A public library (as described in Section 170(e)(6)(B)(i)(III) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(2) The contribution is made not later than three years after the date the taxpayer acquired the property (or in the case of property constructed by the taxpayer, the date the construction of the property is substantially completed).

(3) The original use of the property is by the donor or the donee.

(4) Substantially all of the use of the property by the donee is for use within California for educational purposes in any of the grades K through 12 that are related to the purpose or function of the organization or entity.

(5) The property is not transferred by the donee in exchange for money, other property, or services, except for shipping, installation, and transfer of costs.

(6) The property will fit productively into the entity’s educational plan.

(7) The entity’s use and disposition of the property will be in accordance with paragraphs (4) and (5).

(8) The property meets the standards, if any, as the Secretary of the Treasury may have prescribed by regulation under Section 170(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code to assure that the property meets minimum functionality and suitability standards for educational purposes.

(c) A contribution by a corporation of any computer technology or equipment to a private foundation (as defined in Section 509 of the
 Internal Revenue Code) shall be treated as a qualified computer contribution for purposes of this section if both of the following apply:

(1) The contribution to the private foundation satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (5) of subdivision (b).

(2) Within 30 days after that contribution, the private foundation does both of the following:

(A) Contributes the property to an entity described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) that satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (4) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(B) Notifies the donor of that contribution.

(d) In the case of property that is reacquired by the person who constructed the property, both of the following shall
 apply:

(1) Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall be applied to a contribution of that property by that person by taking into account the date that the original construction of the property was substantially completed.

(2) Paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to that contribution.

(e) For purposes of this section, property shall be treated as constructed by the taxpayer only if the cost of the parts used in the construction of that property (other than parts manufactured by the taxpayer or a related person) do not exceed 50 percent of the taxpayer’s basis in that property.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Computer technology or equipment” means computer software (as
 defined by Section 197(e)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code), computer or peripheral equipment (as defined by Section 168(i)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code), and fiber-optic cable related to computer use.

(2) “Corporation” shall not include any of the following:

(A) An “S corporation.”

(B) A personal holding company (as defined in Section 542 of the Internal Revenue Code).

(C) A service organization (as defined in Section 414(m)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(g) (1) This section shall not apply to any contribution made during any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before December 31, 2001.

(2) This section shall not apply to any contributions made during any taxable year beginning after December 31, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 35, Sec. 50.   Effective May 8, 2002.   Applicable as prescribed by Sec. 74 of Ch. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.10.

(a) For purposes of Section 24357, 80 percent of any amount described in subdivision (b) shall be treated as a charitable contribution.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), an amount is described in this subdivision if each of the following applies:

(1) The amount is paid by the taxpayer to or for the benefit of an educational organization which is:

(A) Described in
 Section 170 (b)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) An institution of higher education as defined in Section 3304(f) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) The amount would be allowable as a deduction under this section but for the fact that the taxpayer receives (directly or indirectly) as a result of paying the amount the right to purchase tickets for seating at an athletic event in an athletic stadium of the institution.

(c) If any portion of a payment is for the purchase of the tickets, the portion and the remaining portion (if any) of the payment shall be treated as separate amounts for purposes of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 102.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

24358.

(a) In the case of a corporation, the total deductions under Section 24357 for any taxable year, other than for contributions to which subdivision (b) applies, shall not exceed 10 percent of the taxpayer’s net income computed without regard to any of the following:

(1) Subdivision (e) of Section 23802.

(2) Sections 24357 to 24359, inclusive.

(3) Article 2 (commencing with Section 24401) of Chapter 7 (except Sections 24407 to 24409, inclusive).

(b) (1) Section 170(b)(2)(B) of the
 Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified conservation contributions by certain corporate farmers and ranchers, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) The phrase “made on or after January 1, 2010,” shall be substituted for “made after the date of the enactment of this subparagraph” in Section 170(b)(2)(B)(i)(II) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Section 170(b)(2)(B)(iii) of the Internal Revenue Code, as it read on January 1, 2015, shall apply.

(c) Section 170(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified conservation contributions by certain Native Corporations, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided. 

(d) Section 170(d)(2) of
 the Internal Revenue Code, relating to corporations, shall apply with respect to excess contributions made during taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 96.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24359.

For purposes of Sections 24357 to 24359, inclusive, the term “charitable contribution” means a contribution or gift to or for the use of—

(a) A state, a possession of the United States, or any political subdivision of any of the foregoing, or the United States or the District of Columbia, but only if the contribution or gift is made for exclusively public purposes.

(b) A corporation, trust, or community chest, fund, or
 foundation—

(1) Created or organized in the United States or in any possession thereof, or under the law of the United States, any state, the District of Columbia, or any possession of the United States;

(2) Organized and operated exclusively for religious, charitable, scientific, literary, or educational purposes or to foster national or international amateur sports competition (but only if no part of its activities involve the provision of athletic facilities or equipment), or for the prevention of cruelty to children or animals;

(3) No part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual; and

(4) Which is not disqualified for tax exemption under Section 23701d by reason of attempting to influence
 legislation, and which does not participate in, or intervene in (including the publishing or distributing of statements), any political campaign on behalf of (or in opposition to) any candidate for public office.

A contribution or gift by a corporation to a trust, chest, fund, or foundation shall be deductible by reason of this section only if it is to be used within the United States or any of its possessions exclusively for purposes specified in paragraph (2). Rules similar to the rules of subdivision (b) of Section 23701d shall apply for purposes of this section.

(c) A post or organization of war veterans, or an auxiliary unit or society of, or trust or foundation for, any post or organization of war veterans—

(1) Organized in the United States or any of its possessions, and

(2) No part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(d) A cemetery company owned and operated exclusively for the benefit of its members, or any corporation chartered solely for burial purposes as a cemetery corporation and not permitted by its charter to engage in any business not necessarily incident to that purpose, if the company or corporation is not operated for profit and no part of the net earnings of the company or corporation inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 89.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24359.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any credit or deduction allowed by Section 23606 or 24357.8 shall not be disallowed on the basis that the contribution is made for the primary or incidental purpose of benefiting the donor in any of the following ways:

(a) Encouraging institutions to interest and train students to use a computer, scientific equipment, or apparatus, thereby enlarging the future potential market by developing prospective purchases. 

(b) Developing and maintaining a favorable public image.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 472, Sec. 29.   Effective October 2, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

24360.

In the case of any bond, as defined in Section 24363, the following rules shall apply to the amortizable bond premium (determined under Section 24361 on the bond):

(a) In the case of a bond, the amount of the amortizable bond premium for the taxable year shall be allowed as a deduction.

(b) In the case of any bond the interest on which is excludable from gross income under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), no deduction
 shall be allowed for the amortizable bond premium for the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24361.

(a) For purposes of subsection (b), the amount of bond premium, in the case of the holder of any bond, shall be determined—

(1) With reference to the amount of the basis (for determining loss on sale or exchange) of such bond;

(2) With reference to the amount payable on maturity or on earlier call date; and

(3) With adjustments proper to
 reflect unamortized bond premium, with respect to the bond, for the period before the date as of which Section 24360 becomes applicable with respect to the taxpayer with respect to such bond.

In no case shall the amount of bond premium on a convertible bond include any amount attributable to the conversion features of the bond.

(b) The amortizable bond premium of the taxable year shall be the amount of the bond premium attributable to such year. In the case of a bond described in Section 24362(a) issued after January 22, 1951, and acquired after January 22, 1954, which has a call date not more than three years after the date of such issue, the amount of bond premium attributable to the taxable year in which the bond is called shall include an amount equal to the excess of the amount of the adjusted basis (for determining loss on sale or exchange) of such bond as of the beginning of the taxable year
 over the amount received on redemption of the bond or (if greater) the amount payable on maturity.

(c) (1) Except as provided in regulations, the determinations required under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be made on the basis of the taxpayer’s yield to maturity determined by—

(A) Using the taxpayer’s basis for purposes of determining loss on sale or exchange of the obligation, and

(B) Compounding at the close of each accrual period (as defined in Section 1272(a)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code).

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), if the amount payable on an earlier call date is used under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) in determining the amortizable bond premium attributable to the period before the earlier call date, that
 bond shall be treated as maturing on that date for the amount so payable and then reissued on that date for the amount so payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 148.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24362.

(a) Sections 24360 to 24363.5, inclusive, shall apply to the bonds only if the taxpayer has elected to have these sections apply; in the case of any taxpayer, bonds the interest on which is not excludable from gross income.

(b) The election authorized under this section shall be made in accordance with such regulations as the Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe. If such election is made with respect to any bond (described in subsection (a)) of the taxpayer, it shall also
 apply to all such bonds held by the taxpayer at the beginning of the first taxable year to which the election applies and to all such bonds thereafter acquired by him and shall be binding for all subsequent taxable years with respect to all such bonds of the taxpayer, unless, on application by the taxpayer, the Franchise Tax Board permits him, subject to such conditions as the Franchise Tax Board deems necessary, to revoke such election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 149.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24363.

For purposes of Sections 24360 to 24363.5, inclusive, the term “bond” means any bond, debenture, note, or certificate or other evidence of indebtedness, but does not include any such obligation which constitutes stock in trade of the taxpayer or any such obligation of a kind which would properly be included in the inventory of the taxpayer if on hand at the close of the taxable year, or any such obligation held by the taxpayer primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course of its trade or business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24363.5.

(a) Except as provided in regulations, in the case of any taxable bond each of the following shall apply:

(1) The amount of any bond premium shall be allocated among the interest payments on the bond under rules similar to the rules of subdivision (c) of Section 24361.

(2) In lieu of any deduction under Section 24360, the amount of any premium so allocated to any interest payment shall be applied against (and operate to reduce)
 the amount of the interest payment.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “taxable bond” means any bond the interest of which is not excludable from gross income.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1352, Sec. 107.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Applicable to income years beginning on or after January 1, 1989, by Sec. 172 of Ch. 1352.)
-------------------------------------------

24364.

Notwithstanding Article 3 (commencing with Section 24421), all expenditures (other than expenditures for the purchase of land or depreciable property or for the acquisition of circulation through the purchase of any part of the business of another publisher of a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical) to establish, maintain, or increase the circulation of a newspaper, magazine, or other periodical shall be allowed as a deduction. However, the deduction shall not be allowed with respect to the portion of such expenditures as, under regulations prescribed
 by the Franchise Tax Board, is chargeable to capital account if the taxpayer elects, in accordance with those regulations, to treat that portion as so chargeable. The election, if made, shall be for the total amount of that portion of the expenditures which is so chargeable to capital account, and shall be binding for all subsequent taxable years unless, upon application by the taxpayer, the Franchise Tax Board permits a revocation of the election subject to such conditions as it deems necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24365.

(a) Section 174 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to research and experimental expenditures, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 174(b) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to refer to subdivision (a) of Section 24916 in lieu of Section 1016(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 174(c) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to refer to Sections 24349 to 24356, inclusive, in lieu of Section 167 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) The amendments made by Section 13206(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97),
 relating to amortization of research and experimental expenditures, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 97.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24368.1.

(a) Section 167(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain term interests not depreciable, shall apply. 

(b) The provisions of Section 7622(b) of Public Law 101-239, relating to the effective date of changes in treatment of transfers of franchises, trademarks, and trade names, shall apply. 

(c) The provisions of Section 7645(b) of Public Law 101-239, relating to the effective date of disallowance of depreciation for
 certain term interests, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 117, Sec. 71.   Effective July 16, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

24369.

Section 175 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to soil and water conservation expenditures, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 49.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

24369.4.

(a) Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expensing of environmental remediation costs, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 198(b)(2) is modified to refer to Sections 24349 to 24355, inclusive, in lieu of Section 167 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Section 198(f) is modified to refer to Section 24442 in lieu of Section 280B of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) For expenditures paid or incurred before January 1, 2004, each of the following shall apply:

(1) If a taxpayer has, at any time, made an election for federal purposes under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to have Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a qualified environmental remediation expenditure, Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply to that qualified environmental remediation expenditure for state purposes, a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5, and the federal election shall be binding for purposes of this part.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to make an election for federal purposes under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code to have Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code apply to a qualified
 environmental remediation expenditure, an election under Section 198(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be allowed for state purposes, Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply to that qualified environmental remediation expenditure for state purposes, and a separate election for state purposes shall not be allowed under paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5.

(e) No inference as to the proper treatment for purposes of this part of qualified environmental remediation expenditures for periods before the enactment of this section shall be made.

(f) Section 198(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to termination, shall not apply.

(g) Section 198 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expensing of environmental remediation costs, shall not apply to expenditures paid or incurred
 after December 31, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 64.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24370.

There shall also be allowed as a deduction, under Chapter 2 of this part, in the case of a mutual savings bank, the entire amount of interest paid to depositors possessing no proprietary interest in the institution or in its surplus, and interest on their deposits to members possessing a proprietary interest in the institution or in its surplus at a rate determined by the Commissioner of Financial Institutions to be the going rate of interest upon savings deposits in this state during the calendar year preceding the taxable year, such rate to be certified